Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1914
Act, how construed.

The Farm Homestead Protection Act shall not be construed to impair any right of a judgment debtor to claim and receive the dollar amount of the exemption afforded to the holder of the homestead under section 40-101.

Laws 1986, Third Spec. Sess., LB 3, § 14.